District of Columbia statutes.
16-912

Repealed

Permanent alimony; enforcement.

Repealed.

Dec. 23, 1963, 77 Stat. 562, Pub. L. 88-241, § 1
Oct. 1, 1976, D.C. Law 1-87, § 15, 23 DCR 2544
Apr. 27, 2001, D.C. Law 13-292, § 803(b)(2), 48 DCR 2087
Oct. 19, 2002, D.C. Law 14-207, § 2(g), 49 DCR 7827
Child support enforcement, attachment or garnishment of wages of District of Columbia employees, see § 1-507.
1981 Ed., § 16-912.
1973 Ed., § 16-912.